Illinois, session 104th, SB3609.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Trademark Registration and Protection Act 5is amended by changing Section 35 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 1036/35)7    Sec. 35. Assignments, changes of name or address, 8voluntary cancellation and other instruments.9    (a) Any mark and its registration under this Act shall be 10assignable with the goodwill of the business in which the mark 11is used, or with that part of the goodwill of the business 12connected with the use of and symbolized by the mark. 13Assignment shall be on a form furnished by the Secretary and 14may be recorded with the Secretary upon the payment of a 15recording fee of $5 payable to the Secretary who, upon 16recording of the assignment, shall issue in the name of the 17assignee a new certificate for the remainder of the term of the 18registration or of the last renewal thereof. An assignment of 19any registration under this Act shall be void as against any 20subsequent purchaser for valuable consideration without 21notice, unless it is recorded with the Secretary within 3 22months after the date thereof or prior to such subsequent 23purchase.  SB3609- 2 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    (b) Any registrant or applicant effecting a change of the 2name or address of the person to whom the mark was issued or 3for whom an application was filed may record, on a form 4furnished by the Secretary, a certificate of change of name or 5address of the registrant or applicant with the Secretary upon 6the payment of a recording fee of $25 $5. The Secretary may 7issue in the name of the assignee a certificate of 8registration of an assigned application. The Secretary may 9issue in the name of the assignee, a new certificate of 10registration for the remainder of the term of the registration 11or last renewal thereof.12    (c) Other instruments which relate to a mark registered or 13application pending pursuant to this Act, such as, by way of 14example, licenses, security interests, or mortgages, may be 15recorded in the discretion of the Secretary, provided that 16instrument is in writing and duly executed.17    (d) Acknowledgement shall be prima facie evidence of the 18execution of an assignment or other instrument and when 19recorded by the Secretary, the record shall be prima facie 20evidence of execution.21    (e) Any mark and its registration under this Act may be 22voluntarily cancelled. Voluntary cancellation shall be on a 23form furnished by the Secretary and may be recorded with the 24Secretary upon the payment of a recording fee of $25, payable 25to the Secretary. The fee shall accompany the application for 26cancellation of registration. A certificate of voluntary   SB3609- 3 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1cancellation shall be issued to the applicant. 2(Source: P.A. 90-231, eff. 1-1-98.) 3    (765 ILCS 1036/62 rep.)4    Section 10. The Trademark Registration and Protection Act 5is amended by repealing Section 62. 6    Section 15. The Business Corporation Act of 1983 is 7amended by changing Sections 1.80, 13.55, 13.75, 14.05, and 814.10 as follows: 9    (805 ILCS 5/1.80)  (from Ch. 32, par. 1.80)10    Sec. 1.80. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 11context otherwise requires, the words and phrases defined in 12this Section shall have the meanings set forth herein.13    (a) "Corporation" or "domestic corporation" means a 14corporation subject to the provisions of this Act, except a 15foreign corporation.16    (b) "Foreign corporation" means a corporation for profit 17organized under laws other than the laws of this State, but 18shall not include a banking corporation organized under the 19laws of another state or of the United States, a foreign 20banking corporation organized under the laws of a country 21other than the United States and holding a certificate of 22authority from the Commissioner of Banks and Real Estate 23issued pursuant to the Foreign Banking Office Act, or a   SB3609- 4 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1banking corporation holding a license from the Commissioner of 2Banks and Real Estate issued pursuant to the Foreign Bank 3Representative Office Act.4    (c) "Articles of incorporation" means the original 5articles of incorporation, including the articles of 6incorporation of a new corporation set forth in the articles 7of consolidation, and all amendments thereto, whether 8evidenced by articles of amendment, articles of merger, 9articles of exchange, statement of correction affecting 10articles, resolution establishing series of shares or a 11statement of cancellation under Section 9.05. Restated 12articles of incorporation shall supersede the original 13articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto prior to 14the effective date of filing the articles of amendment 15incorporating the restated articles of incorporation.16    (d) "Subscriber" means one who subscribes for shares in a 17corporation, whether before or after incorporation.18    (e) "Incorporator" means one of the signers of the 19original articles of incorporation.20    (f) "Shares" means the units into which the proprietary 21interests in a corporation are divided.22    (g) "Shareholder" means one who is a holder of record of 23shares in a corporation.24    (h) "Certificate" representing shares means a written 25instrument executed by the proper corporate officers, as 26required by Section 6.35 of this Act, evidencing the fact that   SB3609- 5 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1the person therein named is the holder of record of the share 2or shares therein described. If the corporation is authorized 3to issue uncertificated shares in accordance with Section 6.35 4of this Act, any reference in this Act to shares represented by 5a certificate shall also refer to uncertificated shares and 6any reference to a certificate representing shares shall also 7refer to the written notice in lieu of a certificate provided 8for in Section 6.35.9    (i) "Authorized shares" means the aggregate number of 10shares of all classes which the corporation is authorized to 11issue.12    (j) "Paid-in capital" means the sum of the cash and other 13consideration received, less expenses, including commissions, 14paid or incurred by the corporation, in connection with the 15issuance of shares, plus any cash and other consideration 16contributed to the corporation by or on behalf of its 17shareholders, plus amounts added or transferred to paid-in 18capital by action of the board of directors or shareholders 19pursuant to a share dividend, share split, or otherwise, minus 20reductions as provided elsewhere in this Act. Irrespective of 21the manner of designation thereof by the laws under which a 22foreign corporation is or may be organized, paid-in capital of 23a foreign corporation shall be determined on the same basis 24and in the same manner as paid-in capital of a domestic 25corporation, for the purpose of computing license fees, 26franchise taxes and other charges imposed by this Act.  SB3609- 6 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    (k) "Net assets", for the purpose of determining the right 2of a corporation to purchase its own shares and of determining 3the right of a corporation to declare and pay dividends and 4make other distributions to shareholders is equal to the 5difference between the assets of the corporation and the 6liabilities of the corporation.7    (l) "Registered office" means that office maintained by 8the corporation in this State, the address of which is on file 9in the office of the Secretary of State, at which any process, 10notice or demand required or permitted by law may be served 11upon the registered agent of the corporation.12    (m) "Insolvent" means that a corporation is unable to pay 13its debts as they become due in the usual course of its 14business.15    (n) "Anniversary" means that day each year exactly one or 16more years after: 17        (1) the date of filing the articles of incorporation 18    prescribed by Section 2.10 of this Act, in the case of a 19    domestic corporation; 20        (2) the date of filing the application for authority 21    prescribed by Section 13.15 of this Act, in the case of a 22    foreign corporation; or 23        (3) the date of filing the articles of consolidation 24    prescribed by Section 11.25 of this Act in the case of a 25    consolidation, unless the plan of consolidation provides 26    for a delayed effective date, pursuant to Section 11.40.  SB3609- 7 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    (o) "Anniversary month" means the month in which the 2anniversary of the corporation occurs.3    (p) "Extended filing month" means the month (if any) which 4shall have been established in lieu of the corporation's 5anniversary month in accordance with Section 14.01.6    (q) "Taxable year" means that 12-month period commencing 7with the first day of the anniversary month of a corporation 8through the last day of the month immediately preceding the 9next occurrence of the anniversary month of the corporation, 10except that in the case of a corporation that has established 11an extended filing month "taxable year" means that 12-month 12period commencing with the first day of the extended filing 13month through the last day of the month immediately preceding 14the next occurrence of the extended filing month.15    (r) "Fiscal year" means the 12-month period with respect 16to which a corporation ordinarily files its federal income tax 17return.18    (s) "Close corporation" means a corporation organized 19under or electing to be subject to Article 2A of this Act, the 20articles of incorporation of which contain the provisions 21required by Section 2.10, and either the corporation's 22articles of incorporation or an agreement entered into by all 23of its shareholders provide that all of the issued shares of 24each class shall be subject to one or more of the restrictions 25on transfer set forth in Section 6.55 of this Act.26    (t) "Common shares" means shares which have no preference   SB3609- 8 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1over any other shares with respect to distribution of assets 2on liquidation or with respect to payment of dividends.3    (u) "Delivered", for the purpose of determining if any 4notice required by this Act is effective, means: 5        (1) transferred or presented to someone in person; or 6        (2) deposited in the United States Mail addressed to 7    the person at his, her or its address as it appears on the 8    records of the corporation, with sufficient first-class 9    postage prepaid thereon.10    (v) "Property" means gross assets including, without 11limitation, all real, personal, tangible, and intangible 12property.13    (w) "Taxable period" means that 12-month period commencing 14with the first day of the second month preceding the 15corporation's anniversary month in the preceding year and 16prior to the first day of the second month immediately 17preceding its anniversary month in the current year, except 18that, in the case of a corporation that has established an 19extended filing month, "taxable period" means that 12-month 20period ending with the last day of its fiscal year immediately 21preceding the extended filing month. In the case of a newly 22formed domestic corporation or a newly registered foreign 23corporation that had not commenced transacting business in 24this State prior to obtaining authority, "taxable period" 25means that period commencing with the filing of the articles 26of incorporation or, in the case of a foreign corporation, of   SB3609- 9 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1filing of the application for authority, and prior to the 2first day of the second month immediately preceding its 3anniversary month in the next succeeding year.4    (x) "Treasury shares" mean (1) shares of a corporation 5that have been issued, have been subsequently acquired by and 6belong to the corporation, and have not been cancelled or 7restored to the status of authorized but unissued shares and 8(2) shares (i) declared and paid as a share dividend on the 9shares referred to in clause (1) or this clause (2), or (ii) 10issued in a share split of the shares referred to in clause (1) 11or this clause (2). Treasury shares shall be deemed to be 12"issued" shares but not "outstanding" shares. Treasury shares 13may not be voted, directly or indirectly, at any meeting or 14otherwise. Shares converted into or exchanged for other shares 15of the corporation shall not be deemed to be treasury shares.16    (y) "Gross amount of business" means gross receipts, from 17whatever source derived, wherever derived. 18    (z) "Open data" means data that is expressed in a 19machine-readable form and that is made freely available to the 20public under an open license, without registration 21requirement, and without any other restrictions that would 22impede its use or reuse. 23    (aa) "Gross amount of business thereof transacted by the 24corporation at or from places of business in this State" means 25the sum of the corporation's receipts from:26        (1) each sale of tangible personal property,   SB3609- 10 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    including, without limitation, sales made through 2    electronic means, if the property is delivered or shipped 3    to a buyer in this State regardless of the free on-board 4    point or another condition of the sale;5        (2) each service performed in this State, except that 6    receipts derived from servicing loans secured by real 7    property are in this state if the real property is located 8    in this State;9        (3) each rental of property situated in this State;10        (4) the use of a patent, copyright, trademark, 11    franchise, license or other intangible personal property 12    in this State;13        (5) each sale of real property located in this State 14    including royalties from oil, gas, or other mineral 15    interests; and16        (6) any other business transacted in this State. 17    (bb) "Distributions as liquidating dividends" means a 18distribution attributable to proceeds from the sale of the 19assets of, or a distribution in kind of the assets of, a trade 20or business which has been actively conducted by the 21corporation throughout the 5-year period immediately before 22the distribution and has been terminated; immediately after 23the distribution, the corporation is actively engaged in the 24conduct of a trade or business, which trade or business was 25actively conducted throughout a 5-year period ending on the 26date of the distribution; and all of the proceeds or assets of   SB3609- 11 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1a terminated trade or business are distributed to the 2corporation's shareholder in the distribution as soon 3thereafter as reasonably possible; provided, however, that 4this definition shall not apply to a distribution by a 5corporation of stock or securities of a corporation which it 6owns, in whole or in part, immediately before the 7distribution. 8(Source: P.A. 102-49, eff. 1-1-22; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 9    (805 ILCS 5/13.55)  (from Ch. 32, par. 13.55)10    Sec. 13.55. Procedure for revocation of authority. 11    (a) After the Secretary of State determines that one or 12more grounds exist under Section 13.50 for the revocation of 13authority of a foreign corporation, he or she shall send by 14regular mail to each delinquent corporation a Notice of 15Delinquency to its registered office, or, if the corporation 16has failed to maintain a registered office, then to the 17president or other principal officer at the last known office 18of said officer.19    (b) If the corporation does not correct the default 20described in paragraphs (c) through (k), and paragraph (m), of 21Section 13.50 within 90 days following such notice, the 22Secretary of State shall thereupon revoke the authority of the 23corporation by issuing a certificate of revocation that 24recites the grounds for revocation and its effective date. If 25the corporation does not correct the default described in   SB3609- 12 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1paragraph (a), (b), or (l) of Section 13.50, within 30 days 2following such notice, the Secretary of State shall thereupon 3revoke the authority of the corporation by issuing a 4certificate of revocation as herein prescribed. The Secretary 5of State shall file the original of the certificate in his or 6her office and mail one copy to the corporation at its 7registered office or, if the corporation has failed to 8maintain a registered office, then to the president or other 9principal officer at the last known office of said officer.10    (c) Upon the issuance of the certificate of revocation, 11the authority of the corporation to transact business in this 12State shall cease and such revoked corporation shall not 13thereafter carry on any business in this State.14    (d) The Secretary of State shall not allow another 15corporation or limited liability company to use the name of a 16foreign corporation that has been revoked until 3 years have 17elapsed following the date of issuance of the notice of 18revocation. If the foreign corporation that has been revoked 19is reinstated within 3 years after the date of issuance of the 20notice of revocation, the foreign corporation shall continue 21under its previous name unless the corporation changes its 22name upon reinstatement. 23(Source: P.A. 95-515, eff. 8-28-07; 96-1121, eff. 1-1-11.) 24    (805 ILCS 5/13.75)25    Sec. 13.75. Activities that do not constitute transacting   SB3609- 13 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1business. Without excluding other activities that may not 2constitute doing business in this State, a foreign corporation 3shall not, except as otherwise required by another State law, 4be considered to be transacting business in this State, for 5purposes of this Article 13, by reason of carrying on in this 6State any one or more of the following activities: 7        (1) maintaining, defending, or settling any 8    proceeding; 9        (2) acting as a governing person of a domestic or 10    foreign entity that is authorized to transact business in 11    this State holding meetings of the board of directors or 12    shareholders or carrying on other activities concerning 13    internal corporate affairs; 14        (3) maintaining bank accounts; 15        (4) maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, 16    exchange, and registration of the corporation's own 17    securities or maintaining trustees or depositaries with 18    respect to those securities; 19        (5) effecting a sale selling through an independent 20    contractor contractors; 21        (6) blank; soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by 22    mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, if 23    orders require acceptance outside this State before they 24    become contracts; 25        (7) (blank); 26        (8) (blank);   SB3609- 14 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1        (9) owning, without more, real or personal property; 2        (10) conducting an isolated transaction that is 3    completed within 120 days and that is not one in the course 4    of repeated transactions of a like nature; or 5        (11) having a corporate officer or director who is a 6    resident of this State.7(Source: P.A. 93-59, eff. 7-1-03.) 8    (805 ILCS 5/14.05)  (from Ch. 32, par. 14.05)9    Sec. 14.05. Annual report of domestic or foreign 10corporation. Each domestic corporation organized under any 11general law or special act of this State authorizing the 12corporation to issue shares, other than homestead 13associations, building and loan associations, banks and 14insurance companies (which includes a syndicate or limited 15syndicate regulated under Article V 1/2 of the Illinois 16Insurance Code or member of a group of underwriters regulated 17under Article V of that Code), and each foreign corporation 18(except members of a group of underwriters regulated under 19Article V of the Illinois Insurance Code) authorized to 20transact business in this State, shall file, within the time 21prescribed by this Act, an annual report setting forth:22        (a) The name of the corporation.23        (b) The address, including street and number, or rural 24    route number, of its registered office in this State, and 25    the name of its registered agent at that address.  SB3609- 15 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1        (c) The address, including street and number, or rural 2    route number, of its principal office.3        (d) The names and respective addresses, including 4    street and number, or rural route number, of its directors 5    and officers.6        (e) A statement of the aggregate number of shares 7    which the corporation has authority to issue, itemized by 8    classes and series, if any, within a class.9        (f) A statement of the aggregate number of issued 10    shares, itemized by classes, and series, if any, within a 11    class.12        (g) A statement, expressed in dollars, of the amount 13    of paid-in capital of the corporation as defined in this 14    Act.15        (h) Either a statement that (1) all the property of 16    the corporation is located in this State and all of its 17    business is transacted at or from places of business in 18    this State, or the corporation elects to pay the annual 19    franchise tax on the basis of its entire paid-in capital, 20    or (2) a statement, expressed in dollars, of the value of 21    all the property owned by the corporation, wherever 22    located, and the value of the property located within this 23    State, and a statement, expressed in dollars, of the gross 24    amount of business transacted by the corporation and the 25    gross amount thereof transacted by the corporation at or 26    from places of business in this State as of the close of   SB3609- 16 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    its fiscal year on or immediately preceding the last day 2    of the third month prior to the anniversary month or in the 3    case of a corporation which has established an extended 4    filing month, as of the close of its fiscal year on or 5    immediately preceding the last day of the third month 6    prior to the extended filing month; however, in the case 7    of a domestic corporation that has not completed its first 8    fiscal year, the statement with respect to property owned 9    shall be as of the last day of the third month preceding 10    the anniversary month and the statement with respect to 11    business transacted shall be furnished for the period 12    between the date of incorporation and the last day of the 13    third month preceding the anniversary month. In the case 14    of a foreign corporation that has not been authorized to 15    transact business in this State for a period of 12 months 16    and has not commenced transacting business prior to 17    obtaining authority, the statement with respect to 18    property owned shall be as of the last day of the third 19    month preceding the anniversary month and the statement 20    with respect to business transacted shall be furnished for 21    the period between the date of its authorization to 22    transact business in this State and the last day of the 23    third month preceding the anniversary month. If the data 24    referenced in item (2) of this subsection is not 25    completed, the franchise tax provided for in this Act 26    shall be computed on the basis of the entire paid-in   SB3609- 17 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    capital.2        (i) A statement, including the basis therefor, of 3    status as a "minority-owned business" or as a "women-owned 4    business" as those terms are defined in the Business 5    Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 6    Disabilities Act.7        (j) Additional information as may be necessary or 8    appropriate in order to enable the Secretary of State to 9    administer this Act and to verify the proper amount of 10    fees and franchise taxes payable by the corporation.11        (k) A statement of whether the corporation or foreign 12    corporation has outstanding shares listed on a major 13    United States stock exchange and is thereby subject to the 14    reporting requirements of Section 8.12.15        (l) For those corporations subject to Section 8.12, a 16    statement providing the information required under Section 17    8.12. 18        (m) For those corporations required to file an 19    Employer Information Report EEO-1 with the Equal 20    Employment Opportunity Commission, information that is 21    substantially similar to the employment data reported 22    under the workforce demographic data portion Section D of 23    the corporation's EEO-1 in a format approved by the 24    Secretary of State. For each corporation that submits data 25    under this paragraph, the Secretary of State shall publish 26    the data on the gender, race, and ethnicity of each   SB3609- 18 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    corporation's employees on the Secretary of State's 2    official website. The Secretary of State shall publish 3    such information within 90 days of receipt of a properly 4    filed annual report or as soon thereafter as practicable. 5    The annual report shall be made on forms prescribed and 6furnished by the Secretary of State, and the information 7therein required by paragraphs (a) through (d), both 8inclusive, of this Section, shall be given as of the date of 9the execution of the annual report and the information therein 10required by paragraphs (e), (f), and (g) of this Section shall 11be given as of the last day of the third month preceding the 12anniversary month, except that the information required by 13paragraphs (e), (f), and (g) shall, in the case of a 14corporation which has established an extended filing month, be 15given in its final transition annual report and each 16subsequent annual report as of the close of its fiscal year on 17or immediately preceding the last day of the third month prior 18to its extended filing month. The information required by 19paragraph (m) shall be included in the corporation's annual 20report filed on and after January 1, 2023. It shall be executed 21by the corporation by its president, a vice-president, 22secretary, assistant secretary, treasurer or other officer 23duly authorized by the board of directors of the corporation 24to execute those reports, and verified by him or her, or, if 25the corporation is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, it 26shall be executed on behalf of the corporation and verified by   SB3609- 19 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1the receiver or trustee.2(Source: P.A. 100-391, eff. 8-25-17; 100-486, eff. 1-1-18; 3100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-589, eff. 8-27-19; 101-656, eff. 43-23-21.) 5    (805 ILCS 5/14.10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 14.10)6    Sec. 14.10. Filing of annual report of domestic or foreign 7corporation. Such annual report together with all fees, taxes 8and charges as prescribed by this Act, shall be delivered to 9the Secretary of State within 60 days immediately preceding 10the first day of the anniversary month and within 30 days 11following the first day of the anniversary month or, in the 12case of a corporation which has established an extended filing 13month, the extended filing month of the corporation each year. 14Proof to the satisfaction of the Secretary of State that prior 15to the first day of the anniversary month and within 30 days 16following the first day of the anniversary month or the 17extended filing month of the corporation such report together 18with all fees, taxes and charges as prescribed by this Act, was 19deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, 20properly addressed, with postage prepaid, shall be deemed a 21compliance with this requirement. If the Secretary of State 22finds that such report conforms to the requirements of this 23Act, he or she shall file the same. If he or she finds that it 24does not so conform, he or she shall promptly return the same 25to the corporation for any necessary corrections, in which   SB3609- 20 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1event the penalties hereinafter prescribed for failure to file 2such report within the time hereinabove provided shall not 3apply, if such report is corrected to conform to the 4requirements of this Act and returned to the Secretary of 5State within 30 days of the date the report was returned for 6corrections.7(Source: P.A. 86-985.) 8    Section 20. The General Not For Profit Corporation Act of 91986 is amended by changing Sections 103.05 and 113.45 and by 10adding Section 114.13 as follows: 11    (805 ILCS 105/103.05)  (from Ch. 32, par. 103.05)12    Sec. 103.05. Purposes and authority of corporations; 13particular purposes; exemptions. 14    (a) Not-for-profit corporations may be organized under 15this Act for any one or more of the following or similar 16purposes:17        (1) Charitable.18        (2) Benevolent.19        (3) Eleemosynary.20        (4) Educational.21        (5) Civic.22        (6) Patriotic.23        (7) Political.24        (8) Religious.  SB3609- 21 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1        (9) Social.2        (10) Literary.3        (11) Athletic.4        (12) Scientific.5        (13) Research.6        (14) Agricultural.7        (15) Horticultural.8        (16) Soil improvement.9        (17) Crop improvement.10        (18) Livestock or poultry improvement.11        (19) Professional, commercial, industrial, or trade 12    association.13        (20) Promoting the development, establishment, or 14    expansion of industries.15        (21) Electrification on a cooperative basis.16        (22) Telephone and Internet service on a mutual or 17    cooperative basis.18        (23) Ownership and operation of water supply 19    facilities for drinking and general domestic use on a 20    mutual or cooperative basis.21        (24) Ownership or administration of residential 22    property on a cooperative basis.23        (25) Administration and operation of property owned on 24    a condominium basis or by a homeowner association.25        (26) Administration and operation of an organization 26    on a cooperative basis producing or furnishing goods,   SB3609- 22 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    services, or facilities primarily for the benefit of its 2    members who are consumers of those goods, services, or 3    facilities.4        (27) Operation of a community mental health board or 5    center organized pursuant to the Community Mental Health 6    Act for the purpose of providing direct patient services.7        (28) Provision of debt management services as 8    authorized by the Debt Management Service Act.9        (29) Promotion, operation, and administration of a 10    ridesharing arrangement as defined in Section 1-176.1 of 11    the Illinois Vehicle Code.12        (30) The administration and operation of an 13    organization for the purpose of assisting low-income 14    consumers in the acquisition of utility and telephone 15    services.16        (31) Any purpose permitted to be exempt from taxation 17    under Sections 501(c) or 501(d) of the United States 18    Internal Revenue Code, as now or hereafter amended.19        (32) Any purpose that would qualify for tax-deductible 20    gifts under the Section 170(c) of the United States 21    Internal Revenue Code, as now or hereafter amended. Any 22    such purpose is deemed to be charitable under subsection 23    (a)(1) of this Section.24        (33) Furnishing of natural gas on a cooperative basis. 25        (34) Ownership and operation of agriculture-based 26    biogas (anaerobic digester) systems on a cooperative basis   SB3609- 23 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    including the marketing and sale of products produced from 2    these, including, but not limited to, methane gas, 3    electricity, and compost. 4        (35) Ownership and operation of a hemophilia program, 5    including comprehensive hemophilia diagnostic treatment 6    centers, under Section 501(a)(2) of the Social Security 7    Act. The hemophilia program may employ physicians, other 8    health care professionals, and staff. The program and the 9    corporate board may not exercise control over, direct, or 10    interfere with a physician's exercise and execution of his 11    or her professional judgment in the provision of care or 12    treatment. 13        (36) Engineering for conservation services associated 14    with wetland restoration or mitigation, flood mitigation, 15    groundwater recharge, and natural infrastructure. 16    Non-profit engineering for conservation services may not 17    be procured by qualifications based selection criteria for 18    contracts with the Department of Transportation, the 19    Illinois State Toll Highway Authority, or Cook County, 20    except as a subcontractor or subconsultant. 21    (b) A corporation may be organized hereunder to serve in 22an area that adjoins or borders (except for any intervening 23natural watercourse) an area located in an adjoining state 24intended to be similarly served, and the corporation may join 25any corporation created by the adjoining state having an 26identical purpose and organized as a not-for-profit   SB3609- 24 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1corporation. Whenever any corporation organized under this Act 2so joins with a foreign corporation having an identical 3purpose, the corporation shall be permitted to do business in 4Illinois as one corporation; provided (1) that the name, bylaw 5provisions, officers, and directors of each corporation are 6identical, (2) that the foreign corporation complies with the 7provisions of this Act relating to the admission of foreign 8corporation, and (3) that the Illinois corporation files a 9statement with the Secretary of State indicating that it has 10joined with a foreign corporation setting forth the name 11thereof and the state of its incorporation.12(Source: P.A. 103-66, eff. 6-9-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 13    (805 ILCS 105/113.45)  (from Ch. 32, par. 113.45)14    Sec. 113.45. Withdrawal of foreign corporation. A foreign 15corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this State may 16withdraw from this State upon filing with the Secretary of 17State an application for withdrawal. In order to procure such 18withdrawal, such foreign corporation shall either:19    (a) Execute and file in duplicate, in accordance with 20Section 101.10 of this Act, an application for withdrawal and 21a final report which shall set forth: 22        (1) That it surrenders its authority to conduct 23    affairs in this State; 24        (2) That it revokes the authority of its registered 25    agent in this State to accept service of process and   SB3609- 25 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    consents that service of process in any suit, action, or 2    proceeding based upon any cause of action arising in this 3    State during the time the corporation was licensed to 4    conduct affairs in this State may thereafter be made on 5    such corporation by service thereof on the Secretary of 6    State; 7        (3) A post office address to which may be mailed a copy 8    of any process against the corporation that may be served 9    on the Secretary of State; 10        (4) The name of the corporation and the state or 11    country under the laws of which it is organized; and 12        (5) Such additional information as may be necessary or 13    appropriate in order to enable the Secretary of State to 14    determine and assess any unpaid fees payable by such 15    foreign corporation as in this Act prescribed; or16    (b) If it has been dissolved, file a copy of the articles 17of dissolution duly authenticated by the proper officer of the 18state or country under the laws of which such corporation was 19organized.20    (c) The application for withdrawal and the final report 21shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the 22Secretary of State.23    (d) When the corporation has complied with subsection (a) 24of this Section, the Secretary of State shall file the 25application for withdrawal and mail a copy of the application 26to the corporation or its representative. If the provisions of   SB3609- 26 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1subsection (b) of this Section have been followed, the 2Secretary of State shall file a copy of the articles of 3dissolution in his or her office.4    (e) The withdrawal is effective on the date of the filing 5of the articles by the Secretary of State or at a subsequent 6date, as outlined in the application of withdrawal, that is no 7later than 30 days after the date on which the application for 8withdrawal is filed by the Secretary of State. 9    Upon the filing of the application for withdrawal or copy 10of the articles of dissolution, the authority of the 11corporation to conduct affairs in this State shall cease.12(Source: P.A. 92-33, eff. 7-1-01.) 13    (805 ILCS 105/114.13 new)14    Sec. 114.13. Report of interim changes of domestic or 15foreign corporations. Any corporation, domestic or foreign, 16may report interim changes in the name, address, or both of its 17officers and directors, its principal office, or status as a 18condominium association, homeowners association, or 19cooperative housing corporation by filing a report under this 20Section containing the following information:21        (1) the name of the corporation;22        (2) the address, including street and number, or rural 23    route number, of its registered office in this State, and 24    the name of its registered agent at that address;25        (3) the address, including street and number, or rural   SB3609- 27 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    route number, of its principal office;2        (4) the names and respective addresses, including 3    street and number, or rural route number, of its directors 4    and officers; and5        (5) a statement as to whether the corporation is a 6    condominium association established under the Condominium 7    Property Act, a cooperative housing corporation defined in 8    Section 216 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, or a 9    homeowners association that administers a common interest 10    community as defined in subsection (c) of Section 9-102 of 11    the Code of Civil Procedures.12    The interim report of changes shall be made on forms 13prescribed and furnished by the Secretary of State and shall 14be executed by the corporation through the corporation's 15president, vice-president, secretary, assistant secretary, 16treasurer, or other officer duly authorized, and verified by 17the person executing the report. If the corporation is in the 18hands of a receiver or trustee, the report shall be executed on 19behalf of the corporation and verified by the receiver or 20trustee. 21    Section 25. The Limited Liability Company Act is amended 22by changing Sections 1-10, 1-20, 5-25, 35-15, 35-25, 45-40, 2345-45, and 50-1 and by adding Sections 1-70, 35-41, 35-43, and 2445-38 as follows:   SB3609- 28 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    (805 ILCS 180/1-10)2    Sec. 1-10. Limited liability company name. 3    (a) The name of each limited liability company or foreign 4limited liability company organized, existing, or subject to 5the provisions of this Act:6        (1) shall contain the terms "limited liability 7    company", "L.L.C.", or "LLC", which must be placed at the 8    end of the company name or, if organized as a low-profit 9    limited liability company under Section 1-26 of this Act, 10    shall contain the term "L3C";11        (2) may not contain a word or phrase, or an 12    abbreviation or derivation thereof, the use of which is 13    prohibited or restricted by any other statute of this 14    State unless the restriction has been complied with;15        (3) shall consist of letters of the English alphabet, 16    Arabic or Roman numerals, or symbols capable of being 17    readily reproduced by the Office of the Secretary of 18    State;19        (4) shall not contain any of the following terms: 20    "Corporation," "Corp.," "Incorporated," "Inc.," "Ltd.," 21    "Co.," "Limited Partnership" or "L.P.";22        (5) shall be the name under which the limited 23    liability company transacts business in this State unless 24    the limited liability company also elects to adopt an 25    assumed name or names as provided in this Act; provided, 26    however, that the limited liability company may use any   SB3609- 29 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    divisional designation or trade name without complying 2    with the requirements of this Act, provided the limited 3    liability company also clearly discloses its name;4        (6) shall not contain any word or phrase that 5    indicates or implies that the limited liability company is 6    authorized or empowered to be in the business of a 7    corporate fiduciary unless otherwise permitted by the 8    Secretary of Financial and Professional Regulation under 9    Section 1-9 of the Corporate Fiduciary Act. The word 10    "trust", "trustee", or "fiduciary" may be used by a 11    limited liability company only if it has first complied 12    with Section 1-9 of the Corporate Fiduciary Act; and13        (7) shall contain the word "trust", if it is a limited 14    liability company organized for the purpose of accepting 15    and executing trusts.16    (b) Nothing in this Section or Section 1-20 shall abrogate 17or limit the common law or statutory law of unfair competition 18or unfair trade practices, nor derogate from the common law or 19principles of equity or the statutes of this State or of the 20United States of America with respect to the right to acquire 21and protect copyrights, trade names, trademarks, service 22marks, service names, or any other right to the exclusive use 23of names or symbols.24    (c) (Blank).25    (d) The name shall be distinguishable upon the records in 26the Office of the Secretary of State from all of the following:  SB3609- 30 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1        (1) Any limited liability company that has articles of 2    organization filed with the Secretary of State under 3    Section 5-5.4        (2) Any foreign limited liability company admitted to 5    transact business in this State.6        (3) Any name for which an exclusive right has been 7    reserved in the Office of the Secretary of State under 8    Section 1-15.9        (4) Any assumed name that is registered with the 10    Secretary of State under Section 1-20.11        (5) Any corporate name or assumed corporate name of a 12    domestic or foreign corporation subject to the provisions 13    of Section 4.05 of the Business Corporation Act of 1983 or 14    Section 104.05 of the General Not For Profit Corporation 15    Act of 1986.16    (e) The provisions of subsection (d) of this Section shall 17not apply if the organizer files with the Secretary of State a 18certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent 19jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to 20the use of that name in this State.21    (f) The Secretary of State shall determine whether a name 22is "distinguishable" from another name for the purposes of 23this Act. Without excluding other names that may not 24constitute distinguishable names in this State, a name is not 25considered distinguishable, for purposes of this Act, solely 26because it contains one or more of the following:  SB3609- 31 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1        (1) The word "limited", "liability" or "company" or an 2    abbreviation of one of those words.3        (2) Articles, conjunctions, contractions, 4    abbreviations, or different tenses or number of the same 5    word.6(Source: P.A. 98-720, eff. 7-16-14; 99-227, eff. 8-3-15.) 7    (805 ILCS 180/1-20)8    Sec. 1-20. Assumed name. 9    (a) A limited liability company or a foreign limited 10liability company admitted to transact business or making 11application for admission to transact business in Illinois may 12elect to adopt an assumed name that complies with the 13requirements of Section 1-10 of this Act except (a)(1).14    (a-5) As used in this Act, "assumed name" means any name 15other than the true limited liability company name, except 16that the following do not constitute the use of an assumed name 17under this Act: 18        (1) A limited liability company's identification of 19    its business with a trademark or service mark of which the 20    company is the owner or licensed user. 21        (2) The use of a name of a division, not containing the 22    word "limited", "liability", or "company" or an 23    abbreviation of one of those words, provided that the 24    limited liability company also clearly discloses its true 25    name.  SB3609- 32 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    (b) Before transacting any business in Illinois under an 2assumed limited liability company name or names, the limited 3liability company shall, for each assumed name, execute and 4file in duplicate an application setting forth all of the 5following: 6        (1) The true limited liability company name. 7        (2) The state or country under the laws of which it is 8    organized. 9        (3) That it intends to transact business under an 10    assumed limited liability company name. 11        (4) The assumed name that it proposes to use.12    (c) The right to use an assumed name shall be effective 13from the date of filing by the Secretary of State until the 14first day of the anniversary month of the limited liability 15company that falls within the next calendar year evenly 16divisible by 5. However, if an application is filed within the 172 months immediately preceding the anniversary month of a 18limited liability company that falls within a calendar year 19evenly divisible by 5, the right to use the assumed name shall 20be effective until the first day of the anniversary month of 21the limited liability company that falls within the next 22succeeding calendar year evenly divisible by 5.23    (d) A limited liability company shall renew the right to 24use its assumed name or names, if any, within the 60 days 25preceding the expiration of the right, for a period of 5 years, 26by making an election to do so at the time of filing its annual   SB3609- 33 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1report form and by paying the renewal fee as prescribed by this 2Act.3    (e) A limited liability company or foreign limited 4liability company may change or cancel any or all of its 5assumed names by executing and filing an application setting 6forth all of the following: 7        (1) The true limited liability company name. 8        (2) The state or country under the laws of which it is 9    organized. 10        (3) That it intends to cease transacting business 11    under an assumed name by changing or cancelling it. 12        (4) The assumed name to be changed or cancelled. 13        (5) If the assumed name is to be changed, the assumed 14    name that the limited liability company proposes to use.15    (f) Upon the filing of an application to change an assumed 16name, the limited liability company shall have the right to 17use the assumed name for the balance of the period authorized.18    (g) The right to use an assumed name shall be cancelled by 19the Secretary of State if any of the following occurs: 20        (1) The limited liability company fails to renew an 21    assumed name. 22        (2) The limited liability company has filed an 23    application to change or cancel the assumed name. 24        (3) A limited liability company has been dissolved. 25        (4) A foreign limited liability company has had its 26    admission to do business in Illinois revoked.  SB3609- 34 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    (h) Any limited liability company or foreign limited 2liability company failing to pay the prescribed fee for 3assumed name renewal when due and payable shall be given 4notice of nonpayment by the Secretary of State by regular 5mail. If the fee, together with a late fee of $100, is not paid 6within 150 60 days after the notice is mailed, the right to use 7the assumed name shall cease. Any limited liability company or 8foreign limited liability company that (i) puts forth any sign 9or advertisement assuming any name other than that under which 10it is organized or otherwise authorized by law to act or (ii) 11violates Section 1-27 is guilty of a petty offense and shall be 12fined not less than $501 and not more than $1,000. A limited 13liability company or foreign limited liability company shall 14be deemed guilty of an additional offense for each day it shall 15continue to so offend. Each limited liability company or 16foreign limited liability company that fails or refuses (1) to 17answer truthfully and fully within the time prescribed by this 18Act interrogatories propounded by the Secretary of State in 19accordance with this Act or (2) to perform any other act 20required by this Act to be performed by the limited liability 21company or foreign limited liability company is guilty of a 22petty offense and shall be fined not less than $501 and not 23more than $1,000.24    (i) A foreign limited liability company may not use an 25assumed or fictitious name in the conduct of its business to 26intentionally misrepresent the geographic origin or location   SB3609- 35 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1of the company.2(Source: P.A. 93-59, eff. 7-1-03.) 3    (805 ILCS 180/1-70 new)4    Sec. 1-70. Abstract of limited liability company record.5    (a) The Secretary of State may, upon receipt of a written 6request and payment of a fee as determined by the Secretary, 7furnish to the person or agency so requesting an abstract of 8the limited liability company record of any domestic or 9foreign limited liability company licensed to do business in 10this State. All requests for abstracts shall be made in the 11manner and the form prescribed by the Secretary of State.12    (b) The Secretary of State may certify an abstract of a 13limited liability company record upon written request. The fee 14for the certification shall be $5 in addition to the fee 15required for furnishing an abstract record. The certification 16shall be made under the signature of the Secretary of State and 17shall be authenticated by the Seal of his office.18    (c) The fees provided in this Section for abstracts of 19limited liability company records and certifications of 20abstracts shall not be applicable to any federal, State or 21local governmental agency requesting such information or 22certification. 23    (805 ILCS 180/5-25)24    Sec. 5-25. Articles of amendment. The articles of   SB3609- 36 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1amendment shall be executed and filed in duplicate and shall 2set forth the following:3        (1) The name of the limited liability company.4        (2) The text of each amendment adopted.5        (3) A statement that the amendment was approved as 6    required by the operating agreement or this Act, as 7    applicable.8        (4) (Blank.)9        (5) The date on which the amendment is to become 10    effective, if the amendment is to become effective after 11    the date on which the articles of amendment are filed. The 12    date shall not exceed 30 days after the date of filing by 13    the Secretary of State. 14        (6) A limited liability company whose period of 15    duration as provided in the articles of organization has 16    expired may amend its articles of organization to revive 17    the articles and extend the period of duration, including 18    making the duration perpetual, at any time within 5 years 19    after the date of expiration. 20(Source: P.A. 95-368, eff. 8-23-07.) 21    (805 ILCS 180/35-15)22    Sec. 35-15. Statement of termination. When a limited 23liability company has been wound up, a statement of 24termination shall be executed in duplicate in the manner 25prescribed in Section 5-45 and shall set forth all of the   SB3609- 37 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1following:2        (1) The name of the limited liability company;3        (2) A post office address to which may be mailed a copy 4    of any process against the company that may be served upon 5    the Secretary of State; and 6        (3) A statement that the limited liability company has 7    been terminated.8    The statement of termination is effective on the date of 9the filing of the statement by the Secretary of State or a 10subsequent date, as outlined in the statement of termination 11that is no later than 30 days after the date on which the 12statement of termination is filed by the Secretary of State. 13(Source: P.A. 99-637, eff. 7-1-17.) 14    (805 ILCS 180/35-25)15    Sec. 35-25. Grounds for administrative dissolution. The 16Secretary of State may dissolve any limited liability company 17administratively if:18        (1) it has failed to file its annual report and pay its 19    fee as required by this Act before the first day of the 20    anniversary month or has failed to pay any fees, 21    penalties, or charges required by this Act;22        (2) it has failed to file in the Office of the 23    Secretary of State any report after the expiration of the 24    period prescribed in this Act for filing the report;25        (2.5) blank; it has misrepresented any material matter   SB3609- 38 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    in any application, report, affidavit, or other document 2    submitted by the limited liability company under this Act; 3        (3) it has failed to appoint and maintain a registered 4    agent in Illinois in accordance with the provisions of 5    this Act;6        (4) a manager or member to whom interrogatories have 7    been propounded by the Secretary of State as provided in 8    Section 5-60 of this Act fails to answer the 9    interrogatories fully and to timely file the answer in the 10    office of the Secretary of State; or 11        (5) it has tendered payment to the Secretary of State 12    which is returned due to insufficient funds, a closed 13    account, or for any other reason, and acceptable payment 14    has not been subsequently tendered; or . 15        (6) if it has fraudulent intent towards or it has 16    misrepresented any material matter in any application, 17    report, affidavit, or other document submitted by the 18    limited liability company under this Act. 19(Source: P.A. 98-171, eff. 8-5-13; 99-608, eff. 7-22-16.) 20    (805 ILCS 180/35-41 new)21    Sec. 35-41. Reinstatement following expiration.22    (a) A limited liability company whose period of duration 23as provided in the articles of organization has lapsed may be 24reinstated by the Secretary of State following date of 25expiration upon:  SB3609- 39 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1        (1) the filing of an application for reinstatement;2        (2) the filing with the Secretary of State by the 3    limited liability company of all reports then due and 4    becoming due;5        (3) the payment to the Secretary of State by the 6    limited liability company of all fees and penalties then 7    due and becoming due; and8        (4) the filing of articles of amendment to extend the 9    period of duration, including making the duration 10    perpetual.11    (b) The application for reinstatement shall be executed 12and filed in duplicate in accordance with Section 5-45 and 13shall set forth the following:14        (1) the name of the limited liability company at the 15    time of the issuance of the notice of dissolution;16        (2) if the name is not available for use as determined 17    by the Secretary of State at the time of filing the 18    application for reinstatement, the name of the limited 19    liability company as changed, provided that any change of 20    name is properly affected under Sections 1-10 and 5-25;21        (3) the date of issuance of the notice of expiration; 22    and23        (4) the address, including street and number or rural 24    route number of the registered office of the limited 25    liability company upon reinstatement thereof and the name 26    of its registered agent at that address upon the   SB3609- 40 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    reinstatement of the limited liability company, provided 2    that any change from either the registered office or the 3    registered agent at the time of dissolution is properly 4    reported under Section 1-35 of this Act.5    (c) When a dissolved limited liability company has 6complied with the provisions of the Section, the Secretary of 7State shall file the application for reinstatement.8    (d) Upon the filing of the application for reinstatement, 9the limited liability company existence shall be deemed to 10have continued without interruption from the date of the 11issuance of the notice of dissolution, and the limited 12liability company shall stand revived with the powers, duties, 13and obligations as if it had not been dissolved. All acts and 14proceedings of its members, managers, officers, employees, and 15agents, acting or purporting to act in that capacity, and 16which would have been legal and valid but for the dissolution, 17shall stand ratified and confirmed.18    (e) Without limiting the generality of subsection (d), 19upon the filing of the application for reinstatement, no 20member, manager, or officer shall be personally liable for the 21debts and liabilities of the limited liability company 22incurred during the period of administrative dissolution by 23reason of the fact that the limited liability company was 24administratively dissolved at the time the debts or 25liabilities were incurred.    SB3609- 41 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    (805 ILCS 180/35-43 new)2    Sec. 35-43. Grounds for judicial dissolution. A circuit 3court may dissolve a limited liability company:4        (1) in an action by the Attorney General, if it is 5    established that:6            (A) the limited liability company filed its 7        articles of organization through fraud;8            (B) the limited liability company has continued to 9        exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by 10        law, or has continued to violate the law, after notice 11        of the same has been given to the limited liability 12        company, either personally or by registered mail; or13            (C) any interrogatory propounded by the Secretary 14        of State to the limited liability company, its 15        officers or directors, as provided in this Act, has 16        been answered falsely or has not been answered fully 17        within 30 days after the mailing of the 18        interrogatories by the Secretary of State or within 19        the extension of time as shall have been authorized by 20        the Secretary of State; and21        (2) in an action by a creditor, if it is established 22    that:23            (A) the creditor's claim has been reduced to 24        judgment, a copy of the judgment has been returned 25        unsatisfied, and the limited liability company is 26        insolvent; or  SB3609- 42 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1            (B) the limited liability company has admitted in 2        writing that the creditor's claim is due and owing, 3        and the limited liability company is insolvent; and4        (3) in an action by the limited liability company to 5    dissolve under court supervision, if it is established 6    that dissolution is reasonably necessary because the 7    business of the limited liability company can no longer be 8    conducted. 9    (805 ILCS 180/45-38 new)10    Sec. 45-38. Revocation; limited liability company name. 11The Secretary of State shall not allow another limited 12liability company or corporation to use the name of a foreign 13limited liability company that has been revoked until 3 years 14have elapsed following the date of issuance of the notice of 15revocation. If the foreign limited liability company that has 16been revoked is reinstated within 3 years after the date of 17issuance of the notice of revocation, the foreign limited 18liability company shall continue under its previous name 19unless the limited liability company changes its name upon 20reinstatement.  21    (805 ILCS 180/45-40)22    Sec. 45-40. Withdrawal. 23    (a) A foreign limited liability company admitted to 24transact business in this State may withdraw from this State   SB3609- 43 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1upon filing with the Secretary of State an application for 2withdrawal. In order to withdraw, the foreign limited 3liability company shall deliver to the Secretary of State an 4application for withdrawal, which shall set forth all of the 5following: 6        (1) The name of the limited liability company and the 7    State or country under the laws of which it is organized. 8        (2) That the limited liability company is not 9    transacting business in this State. 10        (3) That the limited liability company surrenders its 11    admission to transact business in this State. 12        (4) That the limited liability company revokes the 13    authority of its registered agent in this State to accept 14    service of process and consents that service of process in 15    any action, suit, or proceeding based upon any cause of 16    action arising in this State during the time the limited 17    liability company was admitted to transact business in 18    this State may thereafter be made on the limited liability 19    company by service thereof upon the Secretary of State. 20        (5) A post office address to which may be mailed a copy 21    of any process against the limited liability company that 22    may be served on the Secretary of State. 23        (6) All additional information that is necessary or 24    appropriate in order to enable the Secretary of State to 25    determine and assess any unpaid fees payable by the 26    limited liability company as prescribed in this Article.  SB3609- 44 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    The application for withdrawal is effective on the date of 2the filing of the application by the Secretary of State or a 3subsequent date, as outlined in the application for withdrawal 4that is no later than 30 days after the date on which the 5Statement of Withdrawal is filed by the Secretary of State. 6    (b) The application for withdrawal shall be in the form 7and manner designated by the Secretary of State and shall be 8executed by the limited liability company by one of its 9managers or, if none, any member or members that may be 10designated by the members pursuant to limited liability 11company action properly taken under applicable local law or, 12if the limited liability company is in the hands of a receiver 13or trustee, by the receiver or trustee on behalf of the limited 14liability company. This report shall be accompanied by a 15written declaration that it is made under the penalties of 16perjury.17(Source: P.A. 98-171, eff. 8-5-13.) 18    (805 ILCS 180/45-45)19    Sec. 45-45. Transaction of business without admission.20    (a) A foreign limited liability company transacting 21business in this State may not maintain a civil action in any 22court of this State until the limited liability company is 23admitted to transact business in this State.24    (b) The failure of a foreign limited liability company to 25be admitted to transact business in this State does not impair   SB3609- 45 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1the validity of any contract or act of the foreign limited 2liability company or prevent the foreign limited liability 3company from defending any civil action in any court of this 4State.5    (c) A foreign limited liability company, by transacting 6business in this State without being admitted to do so, 7appoints the Secretary of State as its agent upon whom any 8notice, process, or demand may be served.9    (d) A foreign limited liability company that transacts 10business in this State without being admitted to do so shall be 11liable to the State for the years or parts thereof during which 12it transacted business in this State without being admitted in 13an amount equal to all fees that would have been imposed by 14this Article upon that limited liability company had it been 15duly admitted, filed all reports required by this Article, and 16paid all penalties imposed by this Article. If a limited 17liability company fails to be admitted to do business in this 18State within 60 days after it commences transacting business 19in Illinois, it is liable for a penalty of $300 $2,000 plus $25 20$100 for each month or fraction thereof in which it has 21continued to transact business in this State without being 22admitted to do so. The Attorney General shall bring 23proceedings to recover all amounts due this State under this 24Article.25    (e) A member of a foreign limited liability company is not 26liable for the debts and obligations of the limited liability   SB3609- 46 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1company solely by reason of the company's having transacted 2business in this State without being admitted to do so.3(Source: P.A. 93-32, eff. 12-1-03.) 4    (805 ILCS 180/50-1)5    Sec. 50-1. Annual reports. 6    (a) Each limited liability company organized under the 7laws of this State and each foreign limited liability company 8admitted to transact business in this State shall file, within 9the time prescribed by this Act, an annual report setting 10forth all of the following:11        (1) The name of the limited liability company.12        (2) The address, including street and number or rural 13    route number, of its registered office in this State and 14    the name of its registered agent at that address.15        (3) The address, including street and number or rural 16    route number of its principal place of business.17        (4) The name and business address of all of the 18    managers and any member having the authority of a manager.19        (5) Additional information that may be necessary or 20    appropriate in order to enable the Secretary of State to 21    administer this Act and to verify the proper amount of 22    fees payable by the limited liability company.23        (6) The annual report shall be made on forms 24    prescribed and furnished by the Secretary of State, and 25    the information therein, required by paragraphs (1)   SB3609- 47 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    through (4) of subsection (a), both inclusive, shall be 2    given as of the date of execution of the annual report. The 3    annual report shall be executed by a manager or, if none, a 4    member designated by the members pursuant to limited 5    liability company action properly taken under Section 6    15-1.7    (b) The annual report, together with all fees and charges 8prescribed by this Act, shall be delivered to the Secretary of 9State within 30 60 days immediately preceding the first day of 10the anniversary month. Proof to the satisfaction of the 11Secretary of State that, before the first day of the 12anniversary month of the limited liability company, the 13report, together with all fees and charges as prescribed by 14this Act, was deposited in the United States mail in a sealed 15envelope, properly addressed, with postage prepaid, shall be 16deemed a compliance with this requirement. If the Secretary of 17State finds that the report conforms to the requirements of 18this Act, he or she shall file it. If the Secretary of State 19finds that it does not so conform, he or she shall promptly 20return it to the limited liability company for any necessary 21corrections, in which event the penalties prescribed for 22failure to file the report within the time provided shall not 23apply if the report is corrected to conform to the 24requirements of this Act and returned to the Secretary of 25State within 30 60 days of the original due date of the report.26(Source: P.A. 99-637, eff. 7-1-17.)   SB3609- 48 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    Section 30. The Uniform Partnership Act (1997) is amended 2by changing Sections 108 and 1102 as follows: 3    (805 ILCS 206/108)4    Sec. 108. Fees. 5    (a) The Secretary of State shall charge and collect in 6accordance with the provisions of this Act and rules 7promulgated under its authority:8        (1) fees for filing documents;9        (2) miscellaneous charges; and10        (3) fees for the sale of lists of filings and for 11    copies of any documents.12    (b) The Secretary of State shall charge and collect:13        (1) for furnishing a copy or certified copy of any 14    document, instrument, or paper relating to a registered 15    limited liability partnership, $25;16        (2) for the transfer of information by computer 17    process media to any purchaser, fees established by rule;18        (3) for filing a statement of partnership authority, 19    $25;20        (4) for filing a statement of denial, $25;21        (5) for filing a statement of dissociation, $25;22        (6) for filing a statement of dissolution, $100;23        (7) for filing a statement of merger, $100;24        (8) for filing a statement of qualification for a   SB3609- 49 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    limited liability partnership organized under the laws of 2    this State, $300 , $100 for each partner, but in no event 3    shall the fee be less than $200 or exceed $5,000;4        (9) for filing a statement of foreign qualification, 5    $500;6        (10) for filing a renewal statement for a limited 7    liability partnership organized under the laws of this 8    State, $100 for each partner, but in no event shall the fee 9    be less than $200 or exceed $300 $5,000;10        (11) for filing a renewal statement for a foreign 11    limited liability partnership, $300;12        (12) for filing an amendment or cancellation of a 13    statement, $50 $25;14        (13) for filing a statement of withdrawal, $100;15        (14) for the purposes of changing the registered agent 16    name or registered office, or both, $50 $25;17        (15) for filing an application for reinstatement, 18    $200;19        (16) for filing any other document, $50 $25. 20    (c) All fees collected pursuant to this Act shall be 21deposited into the Division of Corporations Registered Limited 22Liability Partnership Fund.23    (d) There is hereby continued in the State treasury a 24special fund to be known as the Division of Corporations 25Registered Limited Liability Partnership Fund. Moneys 26deposited into the Fund shall, subject to appropriation, be   SB3609- 50 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1used by the Business Services Division of the Office of the 2Secretary of State to administer the responsibilities of the 3Secretary of State under this Act. On or before August 31 of 4each year, the balance in the Fund in excess of $600,000 shall 5be transferred to the General Revenue Fund.6    (e) Filings, including annual reports, made by electronic 7means shall be treated as if submitted in person and may not be 8charged excess fees as expedited services solely because of 9submission by electronic means. 10(Source: P.A. 99-620, eff. 1-1-17; 99-933, eff. 1-27-17; 11100-186, eff. 7-1-18; 100-486, eff. 1-1-18; 100-863, eff. 128-14-18.) 13    (805 ILCS 206/1102)14    Sec. 1102. Statement of foreign qualification. 15    (a) Before transacting or continuing to transact business 16in this State, a foreign limited liability partnership must 17file a statement of qualification or a renewal statement under 18Section 1001; provided, however, that the statement must 19contain: 20        (1) the name of the foreign limited liability 21    partnership which satisfies the requirements of the state 22    or other jurisdiction under whose law it is formed and 23    ends with "Registered Limited Liability Partnership", 24    "Limited Liability Partnership", "R.L.L.P.", "L.L.P.", 25    "RLLP", or "LLP";   SB3609- 51 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1        (2) the street address of the partnership's chief 2    executive office and, if different, the street address of 3    an office of the partnership in this State, if any; 4        (3) the name and street address of the partnership's 5    agent for service of process; 6        (4) a brief statement of the business in which the 7    partnership engages; 8        (5) a deferred effective date, if any; and 9        (6) an original certificate of existence or good 10    standing issued within the preceding 60 days by its state 11    of jurisdiction or formation a document or documents 12    sufficient under the laws of the state or jurisdiction in 13    which the limited liability partnership is organized to 14    constitute official certification of current status in 15    good standing as a registered limited liability 16    partnership under the laws of that state or jurisdiction.17    (b) A foreign partnership may not use an assumed or 18fictitious name in the conduct of its business to 19intentionally misrepresent the geographic origin or location 20of the partnership. This subsection (b) does not apply to any 21foreign limited liability partnership that has gross annual 22revenues in excess of $100,000,000.23    (c) A person shall not advertise or cause to be listed in a 24telephone directory an assumed or fictitious business name 25that intentionally misrepresents where the business is 26actually located or operating or falsely states that the   SB3609- 52 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1business is located or operating in the area covered by the 2telephone directory. This subsection (c) does not apply to a 3telephone service provider or to the publisher or distributor 4of a telephone service directory, unless the conduct 5prescribed in this subsection (c) is on behalf of that 6telephone service provider or that publisher or distributor. 7This subsection (c) does not apply to any foreign limited 8liability partnership that has gross annual revenues in excess 9of $100,000,000.10    (d) A foreign limited liability partnership that violates 11this Section is guilty of a petty offense and must be fined not 12less than $501 and not more than $1,000. A foreign limited 13liability partnership is guilty of an additional offense for 14each additional day in violation of this Section.15    (e) The agent of a foreign limited liability partnership 16for service of process must be an individual who is a resident 17of this State or other person authorized to do business in this 18State.19    (f) The status of a partnership as a foreign limited 20liability partnership is effective on the later of the filing 21of the statement of foreign qualification or a date specified 22in the statement. The status remains effective, regardless of 23changes in the partnership, unless the partnership voluntarily 24withdraws by filing a statement of withdrawal, in which event 25the status of the partnership as a foreign limited liability 26partnership shall terminate on the date such statement is   SB3609- 53 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1filed or, if later, a date specified on the statement.2    (g) An amendment or cancellation of a statement of foreign 3qualification is effective when it is filed or on a deferred 4effective date specified in the amendment or cancellation.5    (h) The Secretary of State shall register as a limited 6liability partnership any foreign limited liability 7partnership that submits a completed application with the 8required fee.9(Source: P.A. 92-740, eff. 1-1-03.) 10    Section 35. The Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001) is 11amended by changing Sections 102, 108.5, and 202 and by adding 12Section 813 as follows: 13    (805 ILCS 215/102)14    Sec. 102. Definitions. In this Act:15        (1) "Anniversary" means that day every year exactly 16    one or more years after: (i) the date the certificate of 17    limited partnership was filed by the Office of the 18    Secretary of State, in the case of a limited partnership; 19    or (ii) the date the certificate of authority to transact 20    business was filed by the Office of the Secretary of 21    State, in the case of a foreign limited partnership.22        (2) "Anniversary month" means the month in which the 23    anniversary of the limited partnership or foreign limited 24    partnership occurs.   SB3609- 54 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1        (3) "Certificate of limited partnership" means the 2    certificate required by Section 201. The term includes the 3    certificate as amended or restated.4        (4) "Contribution", except in the phrase "right of 5    contribution", means any benefit provided by a person to a 6    limited partnership in order to become a partner or in the 7    person's capacity as a partner.8        (5) "Debtor in bankruptcy" means a person that is the 9    subject of:10            (A) an order for relief under Title 11 of the 11        United States Code or a comparable order under a 12        successor statute of general application; or13            (B) a comparable order under federal, state, or 14        foreign law governing insolvency.15        (6) "Designated office" means:16            (A) with respect to a limited partnership, the 17        office that the limited partnership is required to 18        designate and maintain under Section 114; and19            (B) with respect to a foreign limited partnership, 20        its principal office.21        (7) "Distribution" means a transfer of money or other 22    property from a limited partnership to a partner in the 23    partner's capacity as a partner or to a transferee on 24    account of a transferable interest owned by the 25    transferee.26        (7.5) "Expired" means a limited partnership has   SB3609- 55 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    reached the duration established in the certificate of 2    limited partnership. 3        (8) "Foreign limited liability limited partnership" 4    means a foreign limited partnership whose general partners 5    have limited liability for the obligations of the foreign 6    limited partnership under a provision similar to Section 7    404(c).8        (9) "Foreign limited partnership" means a partnership 9    formed under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this 10    State and required by those laws to have one or more 11    general partners and one or more limited partners. The 12    term includes a foreign limited liability limited 13    partnership.14        (10) "General partner" means:15            (A) with respect to a limited partnership, a 16        person that:17                (i) becomes a general partner under Section 18            401; or19                (ii) was a general partner in a limited 20            partnership when the limited partnership became 21            subject to this Act under Section 1206(a) or (b); 22            and23            (B) with respect to a foreign limited partnership, 24        a person that has rights, powers, and obligations 25        similar to those of a general partner in a limited 26        partnership.  SB3609- 56 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1        (11) "Limited liability limited partnership", except 2    in the phrase "foreign limited liability limited 3    partnership", means a limited partnership whose 4    certificate of limited partnership states that the limited 5    partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.6        (12) "Limited partner" means:7            (A) with respect to a limited partnership, a 8        person that:9                (i) becomes a limited partner under Section 10            301; or11                (ii) was a limited partner in a limited 12            partnership when the limited partnership became 13            subject to this Act under Section 1206(a) or (b); 14            and15            (B) with respect to a foreign limited partnership, 16        a person that has rights, powers, and obligations 17        similar to those of a limited partner in a limited 18        partnership.19        (13) "Limited partnership", except in the phrases 20    "foreign limited partnership" and "foreign limited 21    liability limited partnership", means an entity, having 22    one or more general partners and one or more limited 23    partners, which is formed under this Act by two or more 24    persons or becomes subject to this Act under Article 11 or 25    Section 1206(a) or (b). The term includes a limited 26    liability limited partnership.  SB3609- 57 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1        (14) "Partner" means a limited partner or general 2    partner.3        (15) "Partnership agreement" means the partners' 4    agreement, whether oral, implied, in a record, or in any 5    combination, concerning the limited partnership. The term 6    includes the agreement as amended.7        (16) "Person" means an individual, corporation, 8    business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited 9    liability company, association, joint venture, government; 10    governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; 11    public corporation, or any other legal or commercial 12    entity.13        (17) "Person dissociated as a general partner" means a 14    person dissociated as a general partner of a limited 15    partnership.16        (18) "Principal office" means the office where the 17    principal executive office of a limited partnership or 18    foreign limited partnership is located, whether or not the 19    office is located in this State.20        (19) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a 21    tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or 22    other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.23        (20) "Required information" means the information that 24    a limited partnership is required to maintain under 25    Section 111.26        (21) "Sign" means:  SB3609- 58 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1            (A) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol with the 2        present intent to authenticate a record; or3            (B) to attach or logically associate an electronic 4        symbol, sound, or process to or with a record with the 5        present intent to authenticate the record.6        (22) "State" means a state of the United States, the 7    District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States 8    Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession 9    subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.10        (23) "Transfer" includes an assignment, conveyance, 11    deed, bill of sale, lease, mortgage, security interest, 12    encumbrance, gift, and transfer by operation of law.13        (24) "Transferable interest" means a partner's right 14    to receive distributions.15        (25) "Transferee" means a person to which all or part 16    of a transferable interest has been transferred, whether 17    or not the transferor is a partner. 18(Source: P.A. 93-967, eff. 1-1-05.) 19    (805 ILCS 215/108.5)20    Sec. 108.5. Assumed name. 21    (a) A limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership 22admitted to transact business in this State may elect to adopt 23an assumed name that complies with the requirements of Section 24108 of this Act except the requirement that the name contain 25the words "limited partnership", "limited liability limited   SB3609- 59 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1partnership", or the abbreviation "L.P.", "LP", "LLLP" or 2"L.L.L.P."3    (b) As used in this Act, "assumed name" means any name 4other than the true name of a limited partnership or the name 5under which a foreign limited partnership is admitted to 6transact business in this State, except that the following do 7not constitute the use of an assumed name under this Act:8        (1) The identification by a limited partnership or 9    foreign limited partnership of its business with a 10    trademark or service mark of which it is the owner or 11    licensed user.12        (2) The use of a name of a division, not constituting a 13    separate limited partnership and not containing the words 14    "limited partnership" or an abbreviation of those words, 15    provided that the limited partnership also clearly 16    discloses its true name.17    (c) Before transacting any business in this State under an 18assumed name or names, the limited partnership or foreign 19limited partnership shall, for each assumed name, execute and 20file in accordance with Section 108 or 204 of this Act, as 21applicable, an application setting forth:22        (1) the true name of the limited partnership or the 23    name under which the foreign limited partnership is 24    admitted to transact business in this State;25        (2) the State or other jurisdiction under the laws of 26    which it is formed;  SB3609- 60 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1        (3) that it intends to transact business under an 2    assumed name; and3        (4) the assumed name which it proposes to use.4    (d) The right to use an assumed name shall be effective 5from the date of filing by the Secretary of State until the 6first day of the anniversary month of the limited partnership 7or foreign limited partnership that falls within the next 8calendar year evenly divisible by 5, however, if an 9application is filed within the 3 months immediately preceding 10the anniversary month of a limited partnership or foreign 11limited partnership that falls within a calendar year evenly 12divisible by 5, the right to use the assumed name shall be 13effective until the first day of the anniversary month of the 14limited partnership or foreign limited partnership that falls 15within the next succeeding year evenly divisible by 5.16    (e) A limited partnership or foreign limited partnership 17may renew the right to use its assumed name or names, if any, 18within the 60 days preceding the expiration of such right, for 19a period of 5 years, by making an election to do so on a form 20prescribed by the Secretary of State and by paying the renewal 21fee as prescribed by this Act.22    (f) Any limited partnership or foreign limited partnership 23may change or cancel any or all of its assumed names by 24executing and filing, in duplicate, an application setting 25forth:26        (1) the true name of the limited partnership or the   SB3609- 61 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    name under which the foreign limited partnership is 2    admitted to transact business in this State;3        (2) the state or country under the laws of which it is 4    organized;5        (3) a statement that it intends to cease transacting 6    business under an assumed name by changing or cancelling 7    it;8        (4) the assumed name to be changed or cancelled;9        (5) the assumed name which the limited partnership or 10    foreign limited partnership proposes to use, if it is to 11    be changed.12    (g) Upon the filing of an application to change an assumed 13name, the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership 14shall have the right to use such assumed name for the period 15authorized by subsection (d) of this Section.16    (h) The right to use an assumed name shall be cancelled by 17the Secretary of State:18        (1) if the limited partnership or foreign limited 19    partnership fails to renew an assumed name;20        (2) if the limited partnership or foreign limited 21    partnership has filed an application to change or cancel 22    an assumed name;23        (3) if a limited partnership's certificate of limited 24    partnership or certificate to be governed by this Act has 25    been cancelled;26        (4) if a foreign limited partnership's application for   SB3609- 62 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    admission to transact business has been cancelled.2    (i) Any limited partnership or foreign limited partnership 3failing to pay the prescribed fee for the assumed name renewal 4when due and payable shall be given notice of nonpayment by the 5Secretary of State by regular mail. If the fee, together with a 6late fee of $50, is not paid within 150 days after the notice 7is mailed, the right to use the assumed name shall cease. Any 8limited partnership carrying on, conducting or transacting 9business under an assumed name which shall fail to comply with 10the provisions of this Section shall be subject to the penalty 11provisions in Section 5 of "An Act in relation to the use of an 12assumed name in the conduct or transaction of business in this 13State", approved July 17, 1941, as amended.14    (j) A foreign limited partnership that applies for and 15receives a certificate of authority under Section 905, is 16deemed to have complied with this Section in full. 17(Source: P.A. 93-967, eff. 1-1-05.) 18    (805 ILCS 215/202)19    Sec. 202. Amendment or restatement of certification. 20    (a) In order to amend its certificate of limited 21partnership, a limited partnership must deliver to the 22Secretary of State for filing an amendment or, pursuant to 23Article 11, articles of merger stating:24        (1) the name of the limited partnership;25        (2) the date of filing of its initial certificate; and  SB3609- 63 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1        (3) the changes the amendment makes to the certificate 2    as most recently amended or restated.3    (b) A limited partnership shall promptly deliver to the 4Secretary of State for filing an amendment to a certificate of 5limited partnership to reflect:6        (1) the admission of a new general partner;7        (2) the dissociation of a person as a general partner; 8    or 9        (3) the appointment of a person to wind up the limited 10    partnership's activities under Section 803(c) or (d).11    (c) A general partner that knows that any information in a 12filed certificate of limited partnership was false when the 13certificate was filed or has become false due to changed 14circumstances shall promptly:15        (1) cause the certificate to be amended; or16        (2) if appropriate, deliver to the Secretary of State 17    for filing a statement of change pursuant to Section 115 18    or a statement of correction pursuant to Section 207.19    (d) Except as provided in Section 210, a certificate of 20limited partnership may be amended at any time for any other 21proper purpose as determined by the limited partnership.22    (e) A restated certificate of limited partnership may be 23delivered to the Secretary of State for filing in the same 24manner as an amendment. A restated certificate of limited 25partnership shall supersede the original certificate of 26limited partnership and all amendments thereto filed prior to   SB3609- 64 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1the effective date of filing the restated certificate of 2limited partnership. 3    (f) Subject to Section 206(c), an amendment or restated 4certificate is effective when filed by the Secretary of State. 5    (g) A limited partnership whose period of duration as 6provided in the certificate of limited partnership has expired 7may amend the certificate of limited partnership to revive its 8certificate and extend the period of duration to perpetual at 9any time within 5 years after the date of expiration. 10(Source: P.A. 97-839, eff. 7-20-12.) 11    (805 ILCS 215/813 new)12    Sec. 813. Reinstatement following duration expiration.13    (a) A limited partnership that expired may be reinstated 14by the Secretary of State following the date of expiration 15upon:16        (1) the filing of an application for reinstatement;17        (2) the filing with the Secretary of State of all 18    reports then due and becoming due; and19        (3) the payment to the Secretary of State of all fees 20    and penalties then due and becoming due;21        (4) the filing of the Amendment to the Certificate of 22    Limited Partnership to extend the period of duration to 23    perpetual.24    (b) The application for reinstatement shall be executed 25and filed in duplicate in accordance with Section 204 and   SB3609- 65 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1shall set forth all of the following:2        (1) the name of the limited partnership at the time of 3    expiration;4        (2) the date of expiration;5        (3) the agent for service of process and the address 6    of the agent for service of process; provided that any 7    change to either the agent for service of process or the 8    address of the agent for service of process is properly 9    reported under Section 115.10    (c) When a limited partnership that has expired has 11complied with the provisions of this Section, the Secretary of 12State shall file the application for reinstatement.13    (d) Upon filing of the application for reinstatement, the 14limited partnership existence shall be deemed to have 15continued without interruption from the date of expiration and 16shall stand revived with such powers, duties, and obligations, 17as if it had not been dissolved. All acts and proceedings of 18its partners, officers, employees, and agents, acting or 19purporting to act in that capacity, and which would have been 20legal and valid but for the dissolution shall stand ratified 21and confirmed.22    (e) Without limiting the generality of subsection (d), 23upon the filing of the application for reinstatement, no 24limited partner or officer of the partnership shall be 25personally liable for the debts and liabilities of the limited 26partnership incurred during the period of expiration by reason   SB3609- 66 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1of the fact that the limited partnership was expired at the 2time the debts or liabilities were incurred.  SB3609- 67 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    765 ILCS 1036/354    765 ILCS 1036/62 rep.5    805 ILCS 5/1.80from Ch. 32, par. 1.806    805 ILCS 5/13.55from Ch. 32, par. 13.557    805 ILCS 5/13.758    805 ILCS 5/14.05from Ch. 32, par. 14.059    805 ILCS 5/14.10from Ch. 32, par. 14.1010    805 ILCS 105/103.05from Ch. 32, par. 103.0511    805 ILCS 105/113.45from Ch. 32, par. 113.4512    805 ILCS 105/114.13 new13    805 ILCS 180/1-1014    805 ILCS 180/1-2015    805 ILCS 180/1-70 new16    805 ILCS 180/5-2517    805 ILCS 180/35-1518    805 ILCS 180/35-2519    805 ILCS 180/35-41 new20    805 ILCS 180/35-43 new21    805 ILCS 180/45-38 new22    805 ILCS 180/45-4023    805 ILCS 180/45-4524    805 ILCS 180/50-125    805 ILCS 206/108  SB3609- 68 -LRB104 19448 SPS 32896 b1    805 ILCS 206/11022    805 ILCS 215/1023    805 ILCS 215/108.54    805 ILCS 215/2025    805 ILCS 215/813 new